dict-sa_sample/sa_IN.aff
# Affix File for Sanskrit Dictionary in Hunspell format
# generated by ShreeDevi Kumar
# Released under GPL


SET UTF-8
LANG hi_IN

TRY ्ायतिरमवेनसकषुपअहदलशथधीणजःचोगभटूृबडखंैङञघछठआफौउझइईएऊढऋऔओऐॄॢॐऌॠ
KEY इई|उऊ|ऑऒओऔॵ|ऄऍऎएऐ|िी|ुू|ॅॆेै|ॉॊोौॏ|डङ|धघ|मभय|बव|ंँ

MAXNGRAMSUGS 10
MAXDIFF 5

ICONV 4
ICONV ॅं ँ
ICONV ाॅ ॉ
ICONV अॉ ऑ
ICONV अॅ ॲ


REP 6
REP र् र्‍
REP र्‍ र् 
REP म् ं
REP ं म्
REP श ष
REP ष श


MAP 1
MAP लळ

BREAK 4
BREAK _
BREAK -
BREAK ˆ-
BREAK -$




FLAG num
SFX 136 Y 1
SFX 136 0 ानि .
SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 0 ुः .
SFX 104 Y 1
SFX 104 0 ावः .
SFX 333 Y 1
SFX 333 0 ड् .
SFX 42 Y 1
SFX 42 0 थुः .
SFX 304 Y 1
SFX 304 0 मः .
SFX 43 Y 1
SFX 43 0 तुः .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 म् .
SFX 324 Y 1
SFX 324 0 तास्थः .
SFX 233 Y 1
SFX 233 0 ्यात् .
SFX 81 Y 1
SFX 81 0 तम् .
SFX 326 Y 1
SFX 326 0 तासि .
SFX 141 Y 1
SFX 141 0 रन् .
SFX 64 Y 1
SFX 64 0 याताम् .
SFX 292 Y 1
SFX 292 0 वः .
SFX 102 Y 1
SFX 102 0 ास्थाम् .
SFX 163 Y 1
SFX 163 0 िष्यन्ति .
SFX 74 Y 1
SFX 74 0 यास्त .
SFX 73 Y 1
SFX 73 0 यास्म .
SFX 72 Y 1
SFX 72 0 यास्व .
SFX 122 Y 1
SFX 122 0 न्ति .
SFX 121 Y 1
SFX 121 0 न्तु .
SFX 24 Y 1
SFX 24 0 स्मः .
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 स्मि .
SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 0 िवहे .
SFX 115 Y 1
SFX 115 0 साथे .
SFX 241 Y 1
SFX 241 0 िध्वे .
SFX 240 Y 1
SFX 240 0 िमहे .
SFX 239 Y 1
SFX 239 0 िरे .
SFX 124 Y 1
SFX 124 0 ध्वम् .
SFX 23 Y 1
SFX 23 0 स्वः .
SFX 63 Y 1
SFX 63 0 यासुः .
SFX 173 Y 1
SFX 173 0 ितास्मः .
SFX 174 Y 1
SFX 174 0 ितास्मि .
SFX 75 Y 1
SFX 75 0 यासम् .
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 0 िषे .
SFX 264 Y 1
SFX 264 0 स्यथ .
SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 0 रः .
SFX 58 Y 1
SFX 58 0 ाताम् .
SFX 22 Y 1
SFX 22 0 रौ .
SFX 203 Y 1
SFX 203 0 र् .
SFX 172 Y 1
SFX 172 0 ितास्वः .
SFX 265 Y 1
SFX 265 0 स्यतः .
SFX 180 Y 1
SFX 180 0 िता .
SFX 80 Y 1
SFX 80 0 ध्वे .
SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 0 स्यति .
SFX 254 Y 1
SFX 254 0 ाते .
SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33 0 ात् .
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 0 यास्तम् .
SFX 301 Y 1
SFX 301 0 यातम् .
SFX 220 Y 1
SFX 220 0 प् .
SFX 158 Y 1
SFX 158 0 िष्यामः .
SFX 160 Y 1
SFX 160 0 िष्यामि .
SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 0 यात् .
SFX 323 Y 1
SFX 323 0 तास्मः .
SFX 297 Y 1
SFX 297 0 रति .
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 0 यति .
SFX 65 Y 1
SFX 65 0 यते .
SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129 0 तः .
SFX 54 Y 1
SFX 54 0 याः .
SFX 302 Y 1
SFX 302 0 यात .
SFX 216 Y 1
SFX 216 0 याम .
SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 0 ता .
SFX 55 Y 1
SFX 55 0 ति .
SFX 214 Y 1
SFX 214 0 याव .
SFX 130 Y 1
SFX 130 0 तु .
SFX 29 Y 1
SFX 29 0 ते .
SFX 261 Y 1
SFX 261 0 स्यसि .
SFX 119 Y 1
SFX 119 0 याथाम् .
SFX 309 Y 1
SFX 309 0 पुरुष .
SFX 156 Y 1
SFX 156 0 िष्यावः .
SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 0 ाम .
SFX 105 Y 1
SFX 105 0 ाव .
SFX 322 Y 1
SFX 322 0 तास्वः .
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 0 ताम् .
SFX 335 Y 1
SFX 335 0 डति .
SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 0 थाः .
SFX 169 Y 1
SFX 169 0 िष्यतः .
SFX 303 Y 1
SFX 303 0 यमान .
SFX 263 Y 1
SFX 263 0 स्यथः .
SFX 171 Y 1
SFX 171 0 िष्यति .
SFX 252 Y 1
SFX 252 0 ाथे .
SFX 61 Y 1
SFX 61 0 यास्ताम् .
SFX 331 Y 1
SFX 331 0 णाति .
SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148 0 ्वा .
SFX 15 Y 1
SFX 15 0 सि .
SFX 114 Y 1
SFX 114 0 से .
SFX 270 Y 1
SFX 270 0 स् .
SFX 259 Y 1
SFX 259 0 स्यामः .
SFX 221 Y 1
SFX 221 0 नाति .
SFX 357 Y 1
SFX 357 0 ्याम् .
SFX 260 Y 1
SFX 260 0 स्यामि .
SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 0 स्वहे .
SFX 125 Y 1
SFX 125 0 थः .
SFX 231 Y 1
SFX 231 0 ्यास्त .
SFX 348 Y 1
SFX 348 0 ्यास्म .
SFX 346 Y 1
SFX 346 0 ्यास्व .
SFX 41 Y 1
SFX 41 0 थे .
SFX 236 Y 1
SFX 236 0 िष्यसि .
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 0 स्महे .
SFX 38 Y 1
SFX 38 0 िथ .
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 िम .
SFX 36 Y 1
SFX 36 0 िव .
SFX 258 Y 1
SFX 258 0 स्यावः .
SFX 118 Y 1
SFX 118 0 वहि .
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 वहे .
SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178 0 ितारः .
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 0 िष्यथः .
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 0 ्यास्तम् .
SFX 179 Y 1
SFX 179 0 ितारौ .
SFX 310 Y 1
SFX 310 0 पते .
SFX 262 Y 1
SFX 262 0 स्यन्ति .
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 0 ट् .
SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 0 ास्ताम् .
SFX 325 Y 1
SFX 325 0 तास्थ .
SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 0 महि .
SFX 305 Y 1
SFX 305 0 महे .
SFX 256 Y 1
SFX 256 0 हि .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 0 हे .
SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 0 है .
SFX 1 Y 1
SFX 1 0 ः .
SFX 57 Y 1
SFX 57 0 ाथाम् .
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 0 ् .
SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 0 त .
SFX 128 Y 1
SFX 128 0 थ .
SFX 78 Y 1
SFX 78 0 य .
SFX 298 Y 1
SFX 298 0 र .
SFX 7 Y 1
SFX 7 0 ि .
SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 0 ु .
SFX 30 Y 1
SFX 30 0 े .
SFX 462 Y 1
SFX 462 0 ौ .
SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 0 ् .
SFX 232 Y 1
SFX 232 0 ्यासुः .
SFX 25 Y 1
SFX 25 0 स्थः .
SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 0 िष्यथ .
SFX 354 Y 1
SFX 354 0 ्यासम् .
SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26 0 स्थ .
SFX 228 Y 1
SFX 228 0 ्याः .
SFX 327 Y 1
SFX 327 0 तारः .
SFX 359 Y 1
SFX 359 0 ्याम .
SFX 356 Y 1
SFX 356 0 ्याव .
SFX 334 Y 1
SFX 334 0 डयति .
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 0 पेरन् .
SFX 328 Y 1
SFX 328 0 तारौ .
SFX 229 Y 1
SFX 229 0 ्यास्ताम् .
SFX 438 Y 1
SFX 438 0 ्थ .
SFX 367 Y 1
SFX 367 0 ्य .
SFX 469 Y 1
SFX 469 0 ोपरि .
SFX 89 Y 1
SFX 89 0 ेयुः .
SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 0 ितास्थः .
SFX 176 Y 1
SFX 176 0 ितास्थ .
SFX 97 Y 1
SFX 97 0 ेताम् .
SFX 91 Y 1
SFX 91 0 ेयम् .
SFX 177 Y 1
SFX 177 0 ितासि .
SFX 127 Y 1
SFX 127 0 थाम् .
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 0 ामः .
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 0 ेः .
SFX 101 Y 1
SFX 101 0 ेत .
SFX 93 Y 1
SFX 93 0 ेम .
SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87 0 ेव .
SFX 107 Y 1
SFX 107 0 ामि .
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 0 ाम् .
SFX 205 Y 1
SFX 205 0 युः .
SFX 95 Y 1
SFX 95 0 ेत् .
SFX 215 Y 1
SFX 215 0 याम् .
SFX 146 Y 1
SFX 146 0 तात् .
SFX 99 Y 1
SFX 99 0 ेतम् .
SFX 424 Y 1
SFX 424 म ्दसि म
SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 थ ामः थ
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 म रे म
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284  ष्टाम् 
SFX 131 Y 1
SFX 131 ट ठाः ट
SFX 449 Y 1
SFX 449 ि ्तयति ि
SFX 371 Y 1
SFX 371 ै ्माय् ै
SFX 155 Y 1
SFX 155 थ िष्यावः थ
SFX 392 Y 1
SFX 392 म ्देव म
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295  वति 
SFX 287 Y 1
SFX 287  षुः 
SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251  ाः 
SFX 219 Y 1
SFX 219 थ महे थ
SFX 358 Y 1
SFX 358 े ्यामहे े
SFX 245 Y 1
SFX 245 थ ितास्थः थ
SFX 489 Y 1
SFX 489 ु ेषत् ु
SFX 395 Y 1
SFX 395 म ्देम म
SFX 94 Y 1
SFX 94 थ ेत् थ
SFX 396 Y 1
SFX 396 म ्देत् म
SFX 234 Y 1
SFX 234 ि ्ति ि
SFX 113 Y 1
SFX 113 थ से थ
SFX 67 Y 1
SFX 67 थ ाव थ
SFX 59 Y 1
SFX 59 य वहि य
SFX 377 Y 1
SFX 377 े ्पिमहे े
SFX 373 Y 1
SFX 373 े ्पे े
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286  ष्ट 
SFX 211 Y 1
SFX 211  यास्त 
SFX 77 Y 1
SFX 77  यति 
SFX 318 Y 1
SFX 318 त थाः त
SFX 88 Y 1
SFX 88 थ ेयुः थ
SFX 164 Y 1
SFX 164 थ िष्यथः थ
SFX 40 Y 1
SFX 40 म यम् म
SFX 463 Y 1
SFX 463 ी ोष्टा ी
SFX 458 Y 1
SFX 458 ी ंश् ी
SFX 482 Y 1
SFX 482 ी ोक्ष्यति ी
SFX 450 Y 1
SFX 450 ै ्णौति ै
SFX 397 Y 1
SFX 397 म ्देताम् म
SFX 344 Y 1
SFX 344  ्याः 
SFX 338 Y 1
SFX 338  ्स् 
SFX 271 Y 1
SFX 271 व सुः व
SFX 253 Y 1
SFX 253  ाथाम् 
SFX 84 Y 1
SFX 84 थ ेः थ
SFX 459 Y 1
SFX 459  ं 
SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 थ िष्यतः थ
SFX 126 Y 1
SFX 126  थे 
SFX 488 Y 1
SFX 488 ु ेष्ट ु
SFX 420 Y 1
SFX 420 म ्दामः म
SFX 337 Y 1
SFX 337 े ्स्यात् े
SFX 35 Y 1
SFX 35 थ मि थ
SFX 468 Y 1
SFX 468 ै ोभते ै
SFX 444 Y 1
SFX 444 म ्तास्थ म
SFX 409 Y 1
SFX 409 म ्दितास्वः म
SFX 313 Y 1
SFX 313 त ध्वम् त
SFX 272 Y 1
SFX 272  ष्वहि 
SFX 269 Y 1
SFX 269 व स्तम् व
SFX 243 Y 1
SFX 243 थ ितास्मः थ
SFX 162 Y 1
SFX 162 थ िष्यन्ति थ
SFX 140 Y 1
SFX 140  ष्यत 
SFX 317 Y 1
SFX 317  दति 
SFX 82 Y 1
SFX 82 े ्वहे े
SFX 306 Y 1
SFX 306 त महि त
SFX 17 Y 1
SFX 17  थाम् 
SFX 10 Y 1
SFX 10 थ ावः थ
SFX 499 Y 1
SFX 499 ु ेप्स्यति ु
SFX 418 Y 1
SFX 418 म ्दावः म
SFX 393 Y 1
SFX 393 म ्देयुः म
SFX 383 Y 1
SFX 383 म ्द्यास्व म
SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283  ष्ठाः 
SFX 282 Y 1
SFX 282  ष्म 
SFX 195 Y 1
SFX 195  ष्यामहि 
SFX 340 Y 1
SFX 340 े ्ये े
SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19  हि 
SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289  षाताम् 
SFX 100 Y 1
SFX 100 थ ेत थ
SFX 430 Y 1
SFX 430 म ्दतः म
SFX 405 Y 1
SFX 405 म ्दिष्यथः म
SFX 370 Y 1
SFX 370 ि ्मि ि
SFX 193 Y 1
SFX 193  ष्येताम् 
SFX 453 Y 1
SFX 453 ै ्णविता ै
SFX 352 Y 1
SFX 352  ्यासुः 
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 थ सि थ
SFX 498 Y 1
SFX 498  ेम 
SFX 143 Y 1
SFX 143 थ न्ते थ
SFX 83 Y 1
SFX 83 े ्महे े
SFX 478 Y 1
SFX 478 ी ोत्स्यति ी
SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188  स्थः 
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 थ ाम थ
SFX 407 Y 1
SFX 407 म ्दिष्यतः म
SFX 379 Y 1
SFX 379 े ्पाथे े
SFX 200 Y 1
SFX 200 व षे व
SFX 442 Y 1
SFX 442 म ्तास्मि म
SFX 365 Y 1
SFX 365 ि ्यते ि
SFX 86 Y 1
SFX 86 थ ेव थ
SFX 76 Y 1
SFX 76  यते 
SFX 451 Y 1
SFX 451 ै ्णु ै
SFX 445 Y 1
SFX 445 म ्तासि म
SFX 368 Y 1
SFX 368 ै ्मील् ै
