dict-sa_sample/sa_IN.dic
अजनि/196,198,283,286,289
अजाये/17
अटिता/70,71,138,182,185,186,188,189
अण्/76
अतिता/70,71,138,182,185,186,188,189
अतिवा/77
अददि/139,140,193,194,195,201,272,286,289,291,332
अददे/16,17
अदास्याम/19
अदास्याव/19
अधुक्षाम/19
अधोक्ष्ये/17
अनन्दि/140,199,273,275,276,277,278,279,284,285,287,290
अनयाम/19
अनये/17
अनादि/282,287,290
अनेष्याम/19
अनेष्याव/19
अनेष्ये/17
अये/16,51,126,294,300,314
अयेय/253,255
अर्च/109,145,345,347,350,352,360,484
अर्चत/3,8,56,109,338
अर्चिता/182,185,186,188,189
अर्च्/142,207,208,209,210,211,212,217
अलभे/16,17
आप्/76,223,311
इन्/316,317
इन्द्र/459
उच्/77
ऋध्/76,77,311
एधे/17,126,296,314
कम्पिष्ये/51,126
कम्पे/64,119,120,124,127
कर्त्/203
काङ्क्ष/15,45,52,87,93,97,101,104,105,106,108,121,122,128,129,156,158,171,175,177,180,229,231,356,359
काङ्क्ष्/50,54
कीर्य/29
कुट्/227
कुण्/227,333,334,335
कुथ्/20
कुश्/20
कुषित/148
कूल/9,55
क्रम्/20
क्राम्/20
क्री/331,333,334,335,456,457,458,463,464,470,471,472,474,478
क्रुध्/20,303
क्लिश्/65
क्लिष्ट/148
क्षम्/220
क्षार/77
क्षि/310
क्षिप्/77,218
क्षु/203,220,488,494,499
क्षुद्/298
क्षुभ्/221
क्षै/371,372,450,452,455,467,468,473,476,481
ख्या/55
गदत/4,6,7,33
गदथ/1
गदाम/1,7
गदाव/1
गदिता/21,24,26
गदिष्यथ/1,11
गदेत/6,9
गद्/62,72
घ्रा/184,258,259,260,261,262,263,264,265,322,324,325,326,327,328,329
घ्रेयास्त/4
चकमे/373,374,377,378,380
चिचित/31,36,42,43
चित्/50,54,61,62,72,73,75
चेतत/1,4,7,32,33
चेतथ/1,10,11,12,14,67,68,69,86,88,90,92,94,96,98,100,155,157,159,162,166,170,242,243,245,246,247,249,250
जगद/37
जगाद/31,38,42,43
जघ्र/31,36,38,42,462
जनिता/18,22,114
जनिषीष्ट/131
जाये/45,52,78,118,119,120,127,141,144
जिघ्रत/1,6
जिघ्रथ/1,10,11,13,14,67,68,79,84,86,88,92,96,100
तन्/20
तपत/4,7
तपथ/1
तपाम/1,7
तपेत/4,6,9
तपेम/39,40
तप्/50,54,61,72,73,75,184,260,261,264,265,322,323,324,326,327,328
तप्ता/26,34
तस्/78
तेप/36,37,43
दत्त/1
ददतु/1
ददाथ/219
ददाम/18,110
ददितासे/82
ददिथ/123,202,219
ददिम/18,204
ददिव/18,200
ददिषीष्ट/131
ददिष्ये/29,41
ददीत/306,313,318
ददे/64,119,124
ददेत/4,318
दद्/50,54,80,124,205,214,215,292,293,301,302,304
दाता/22,23,26,111,112
दासीष्ट/131
दास्यथ/1,10,11,12,13,14,113,123,134,135,143
दास्ये/29
दुग्ध/1,4,6,30,33
दुदुह/43,237,254
दुदुहिम/18,204
दुहीत/306,313,318
दुहीय/57,58,59
दुहे/82,147,149
दुह्/50,54,61,62,63,64,72,73,74,75,214,215,216,292,293,301,302
देयास्त/4,6
दोग्धा/21
दोग्धासे/82,83,152
दोहाव/110
धुक्षीय/60,103,116
धुक्षीष्ट/131
धोक्षि/365
धोक्ष्यथ/1,123,135
धोक्ष्ये/29,41
नदत/7
नदाम/1,7
नदिता/15
नदेत/4,6,9
नदेम/39,40
नद्/50,61,62,63,73,74,75
ननन्द/31,36,37,38,42,43
नन्ता/15,22,26,34
नन्द/93
नन्दत/1,4,6,7,32,33
नन्दथ/1,10,11,12,13,14,68,69,79,84,88,90,94,96,98,100,155,157,159,161,162,164,170,242,243,244,245,246,247,248,249,250
नन्दाव/1
नन्दिष्यथ/1,10,11,12,13,14
नमत/1,32
नमाव/1
नम्/50,54,61,62,63,72,73,74,75
नये/1,41,81,120,127,144
नयेत/4,30,313,454
नयेम/40
नयेय/6,57,59
नयेव/256
निनय/38
निन्य/31,36,37,43,237,238,239,240,241,252,254
नृत्/20
नेता/21,22,24,25,26,34,80,111,114,115
नेद/31,36,37,38,42,43
नेम/37,43
नेषीय/102,103,116,117
नेष्यथ/1,10,11,12,13,14,113,123,134,135
नेष्ये/29,41
नंस्यथ/1,12
पाता/15
पास्यथ/1,13
पिब/15,45,52,55,81,85,87,89,91,93,95,97,99,101,104,105,106,107,108,121,122,125,128,129,130,136,146
पेयास्त/6
प्रथम/309
भवत/7,32
भवाव/1
भविष्यथ/10,13,14
भवेत/4,6,9
मध्यमपुरुष/1
लभे/29,119,120,127,144
वस्/29
स्म/65,270
